Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1024
Personal use prohibited; penalty.

No officer or employee of the State of Nebraska shall use any motor vehicle owned by the State of Nebraska for any personal use whatsoever. Any officer or employee who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a Class V misdemeanor, and in addition thereto the officer or employee shall be deemed guilty of official misconduct in office for palpable omission of duty, and upon conviction thereof the court shall have the power to add to the judgment that any officer or employee so convicted shall be removed from office or employment.

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 16, p. 710;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-1204;

R.S.1943, § 60-1005;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 88;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 35;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-1005;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 487.